Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 19. Supervised Medical Use of Hemp Extracts

History.

2015 ch. 102, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 35-7-1901.
Definitions. [Repealed]

History.

2015 ch. 102, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 86, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; repealed by 2019 ch. 173, § 3, effective March 6, 2019.

§ 35-7-1902.
Hemp extract registration cards. [Repealed]

History.

2015 ch. 102, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 86, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; repealed by 2019 ch. 173, § 3, effective March 6, 2019.

§ 35-7-1903.
Exemption from criminal and civil penalties for the medical use of hemp extract. [Repealed]

History.

2015 ch. 102, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; repealed by 2019 ch. 173, § 3, effective March 6, 2019.